Maryland, session 2025, HB0754.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
4–202.
(a) A local licensing board is authorized to issue licenses in its jurisdiction.
(d) A local licensing board by regulation may:
(1) restrict, in accordance with a definite standard, the number of licenses
that the local licensing board considers sufficient for a neighborhood;
(2) regulate the use of mechanical music boxes and other sound–making
devices;
(3) divide a municipality or county into districts; and
(4) establish areas in which a license may not be issued.
– 1 –

Ch. 810 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(e) An applicant for a license or a license holder who is aggrieved by a regulation
adopted under this section may seek judicial review as provided in Subtitle 9 of this title.
4–208.
(a) Before a local licensing board may approve an application for a license, the
local licensing board shall publish notice of the application two times in 2 successive weeks:
(1) in two newspapers of general circulation in the jurisdiction; or
(2) if only one newspaper of general circulation exists in the jurisdiction, in
that newspaper.
(b) The notice shall state:
(1) the name of the applicant;
(2) the type of license for which the application is made;
(3) the location described in the application; and
(4) the date, time, and place set by the local licensing board for a hearing
on the application.
22–102.
This title applies only in Harford County.
22–209.
(a) The Board may adopt regulations to carry out this article.
(b) (1) The Board shall hold public hearings on all proposed alterations of its
regulations.
(2) [The hearings shall be advertised at] AT least 2 consecutive weeks
before the scheduled public hearings, THE BOARD SHALL:
(i) ADVERTISE THE PUBLIC HEARINGS in at least one newspaper
of general circulation published in the county; [and] OR
(ii) [on the website of the Board] POST NOTICE OF THE PUBLIC
HEARINGS ONLINE.
22–1501.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 810
(b) The following sections of Title 4, Subtitle 2 (“Issuance or Denial of Local
Licenses”) of Division I of this article apply in the county:
(4) § 4–208 (“Notice of license application required”), subject to § 22–1505
of this subtitle;
22–1505.
(a) Before holding a hearing for an application for a license, the Board shall
[publish notice of the application two times in 2 successive weeks]:
(1) PUBLISH NOTICE OF THE APPLICATION TWO TIMES IN 2
SUCCESSIVE WEEKS in one newspaper of general circulation published in the county;
[and] OR
(2) [on the Board’s website] POST NOTICE OF THE APPLICATION
HEARING ONLINE AT LEAST 14 DAYS BEFORE THE APPLICATION HEARING DATE.
(b) (1) For a hearing for an application for a new license or an upgrade to an
existing license, the Board shall post a notice in a conspicuous location on the exterior of
the location described in the application.
(2) The notice shall be on a sign that measures at least 12 by 18 inches and
include:
(i) the class of license for which application is made;
(ii) the name of the applicant; and
(iii) the date, time, and location for the application hearing.
(3) The notice shall remain posted for 20 days before the hearing.
(c) (1) The Board shall publish its decision on an application for a new license,
an upgrade of an existing license, or a change of location of an existing license:
(i) in one newspaper of general circulation published in the county;
[and] OR
(ii) on the Board’s website.
(2) The decision shall state the name of the license holder, the type of
license, and the location of the premises.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
– 3 –

Ch. 810 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 4 –